Hawaii statutes.
§152-4 Designation of noxious weed.
The department may designate certain plant species as noxious weeds following
the criteria and procedures established under section 152-2(1). The department
shall publish and make available a list of noxious weeds to interested persons.
[L 1975, c 44, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 92, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next